New Jersey, session 222, A5432.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The New Jersey Transit Corporation shall establish a public awareness campaign to provide information to the public concerning: (1)   the dangers of trains and railroad tracks; and (2)   rail safety, including, but not limited to, safe practices for motorists, bicyclists, and pedestrians to observe on and around railroad tracks and railroad crossings. b.    The corporation shall review and update, as necessary, the public awareness campaign on an annual basis. 2.    Within one year of the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall, in consultation with the Commissioner of Transportation and the Board of Public Utilities, as appropriate, review and increase safety signage, as needed along all railroad crossings, provided that the signs comply with applicable federal laws and regulations. 3.    The New Jersey Transit Corporation shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.